North Dakota statutes. TITLE 48 Public Buildings
CHAPTER 48-01.2 Public Improvement Bids and Contracts

48-01.2-01.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Agency construction management” means a public improvement delivery method through which a person provides to a governing body experienced construction management services, including ideas on constructability, documentation of design and construction, and coordination of project schedules.

“Architect” means an individual registered as an architect under chapter 43-03.

“Common ownership” means a shared management or ownership interest in two or more entities.

“Construction” means the process of building, altering, repairing, improving, or demolishing any public structure or building or other improvement to any public property. The term does not include the routine operation or maintenance of existing facilities, structures, buildings, or real property or demolition projects costing less than the threshold established under section 48-01.2-02.1.

“Construction administration” means administrative services provided by a governing body or an architect, a landscape architect, or an engineer, and includes providing clarifications, submittal review, recommendations for payment, preparation of change orders, and other administrative services included in the agreement with the architect, landscape architect, or engineer. The term does not include supervision of the construction activities for the construction contracts.

“Construction management at-risk” means a public improvement delivery method through which a construction manager provides advice to the governing body during the planning and design phase of a public improvement, negotiates a contract with the governing body for the general construction bid package of the public improvement, and contracts with subcontractors and suppliers for the actual construction of the public improvement.

“Construction manager” means a contractor licensed under chapter 43-07 or an individual employed by a licensed contractor which has the expertise and resources to assist a governing body with the management of the design, contracting, and construction aspects of a public improvement.

“Construction observation” means observation of construction work and site visits by an architect, a landscape architect, or an engineer to assist the governing body in determining that the work conforms in general to the requirements of the construction contract and that the contractor has implemented and maintained the integrity of the design concept of a project as a functioning whole as indicated in the construction contract.

“Contract” means a type of agency agreement for the procurement of services under this chapter.

“Contractor” means any person, duly licensed, that undertakes or enters a contract with a governing body for the construction or construction management of any public improvement, including multiple prime contracts.

“Design services” means architect services, engineer services, landscape architect services, or surveyor services.

“Design-bid-build” means a project delivery method in which design and construction of the project are in sequential phases, and in which the first project phase involves design services, the second project phase involves securing a contractor through a bidding process, and the third project phase provides for construction of the project by a contractor awarded the project.

“Emergency situation” means a sudden generally unexpected occurrence that requires immediate action to protect public health, safety, or property and which ends when the immediate threat to public health, safety, or property ceases and services are restored. The term does not include a lack of planning on the part of the governing body, architect, engineer, landscape architect, or contractor.

“Engineer” means an individual registered as an engineer under chapter 43-19.1.

“General conditions” means the written portion of a contract setting forth the governing body’s minimum acceptable performance requirements, including the rights, responsibilities, and relationships of the parties involved in the performance of the contract.

“Governing body” means the governing officer or board of a state entity or a political subdivision.

“Guaranteed maximum price” means the maximum amount a construction manager at-risk may be paid under a contract to construct a public improvement.

“Landscape architect services” means landscape architecture services governed under chapter 43-03.

“Lowest responsible bidder” means the lowest best bidder for the project considering past experience, financial condition, past work with the governing body, and other pertinent attributes that may be identified in the advertisement for bids.

“Political subdivision” means a county, township, park district, school district, city, and any other unit of local government which is created either by statute or by the Constitution of North Dakota for local government or other public purposes.

“Public improvement” means any improvement undertaken by a governing body for the good of the public and which is paid for with any public funds, including public loans, bonds, leases, or alternative funding, and is constructed on public land or within an existing or new public building or any other public infrastructure or facility if the result of the improvement will be operated and maintained by the governing body. The term does not include a county road construction and maintenance, state highway, or public service commission project governed by title 11, 24, or 38.

“Subcontractor” means a person that contracts to perform work or render a service to a contractor or to another subcontractor as part of a contract with a governing body.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 403, § 14; 2011, ch. 343, § 1; 2017, ch. 319, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

48-01.2-02.
Plans and specifications for a public improvement contract.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, if the estimated cost for the construction of a public improvement is in excess of the threshold established under section 48-01.2-02.1, the governing body shall procure plans, drawings, and specifications for the improvement from an architect or engineer. For a public building in use by or to be used by the North Dakota agricultural experiment station in connection with farm or agricultural research operations, the plans, drawings, and specifications, with the approval of the state board of higher education, may be prepared by an engineer in the regular employment of the agricultural experiment station. For a public building in use by or to be used by the department of transportation for the storage and housing of road materials or road machinery, equipment, and tools, the plans, drawings, and specifications may be prepared by an engineer employed by the department of transportation. Plans, drawings, and specifications of an architect or engineer must be stamped and sealed by the date of the initial bid advertisement.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 403, § 14; 2011, ch. 343, § 2; 2015, ch. 317, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 317, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

48-01.2-02.1.
Public improvement construction threshold.

The threshold for bidding construction of a public improvement is two hundred thousand dollars. The threshold for procuring plans, drawings, and specifications from an architect or engineer for construction of a public improvement is two hundred thousand dollars.

Notwithstanding the thresholds in subsection 1, if the state or a political subdivision undertakes the construction of a public improvement and there is reason to believe that engineering or architectural services are necessary to protect the health, safety, or welfare of the public, the state or political subdivision shall consider consulting with an engineer or architect.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 343, § 3; 2015, ch. 154, § 3, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 320, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 381, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 154, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 4 of chapter 154, S.L. 2015 provides,

“APPLICATION

. Sections 2 and 3 (which amended this section) of this Act apply to any public improvement project for which a contract or agreement for plans, drawings, or specifications is executed after the effective date of this Act.”

48-01.2-03.
Specified brands, marks, names, or patented articles may not be specified.

A governing body, in specifying materials to be used for a public improvement or in plans or specifications for a public improvement, may not request bids for any article of a specified or copyrighted brand or name, the product of any one manufacturer, or any patented apparatus or appliance when the requirement will prevent proper competition, unless the specifications also request bids on other similar articles of equal value, utility, and merit or unless as provided in section 44-08-01.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 403, § 14; 2011, ch. 344, § 1.

48-01.2-04.
Publication of advertisement for bids — Emergency exception.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, if the estimated cost for the construction of a public improvement is in excess of the threshold established under section 48-01.2-02.1, the governing body shall advertise for bids by publishing for three consecutive weeks. The first publication of the advertisement must be at least twenty-one days before the date of the opening of bids. The advertisement must be published in the official newspaper of the political subdivision in which the public improvement is or will be located, in a daily newspaper having a general circulation in the area where the project is located, and in a trade publication, electronic plan service, builders exchange, or other industry-recognized method of general circulation among the contractors, building manufacturers, and dealers in this state, except the advertisement for a public improvement financed by special assessments need be published only once each week for two weeks in the official newspaper with the first publication being at least fourteen days before the bid opening.

If a governing body declares an emergency situation, the governing body may contract for the construction of a public improvement without seeking bids.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 403, § 14; 2011, ch. 343, § 4; 2013, ch. 356, § 1; 2015, ch. 317, § 2, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 317, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 356, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

48-01.2-05.
Contents of advertisement.

The advertisement for bids required by section 48-01.2-04 must state:

The nature of the work and the type and location of the proposed public improvement.

When and where the plans, drawings, and specifications may be seen and examined.

The place, date, and time the bids will be opened.

That each bid must be accompanied by a separate envelope containing the contractor’s license and bid security. The bid security must be in a sum equal to five percent of the full amount of the bid and must be in the form of a bidder’s bond. A bidder’s bond must be executed by the bidder as principal and by a surety, conditioned that if the principal’s bid is accepted and the contract awarded to the principal, the principal, within ten days after notice of the award, shall execute a contract in accordance with the terms of the bid and the bid bond and any condition of the governing body. A countersignature of a bid bond is not required under this section. If a successful bidder does not execute a contract within the ten days allowed, the bidder’s bond must be forfeited to the governing body and the project awarded to the next lowest responsible bidder.

That a bidder, except a bidder on a municipal, rural, and industrial water supply project using funds provided under Public Law No. 99-294 [100 Stat. 426; 43 U.S.C. 390a], must be licensed for the full amount of the bid as required by section 43-07-12. For projects using funds provided under Public Law No. 99-294 [100 Stat. 426; 43 U.S.C. 390a], the advertisement must state that, unless a bidder obtains a contractor’s license for the full amount of its bid within twenty days after it is determined the bidder is the lowest responsible bidder, the bid must be rejected and the contract awarded to the next lowest responsible bidder.

That no bid may be read or considered if the bid does not fully comply with the requirements of this section and that any deficient bid submitted must be resealed and returned to the bidder immediately.

That the governing body reserves the right to reject any and all bids and rebid the project until a satisfactory bid is received.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 403, § 14.

Note.

This section is set out above to reflect a correction from the state since the 2015 cumulative supplement. In subdivision (5) “section” was substituted for “sections 43-07-05 and”.

48-01.2-06.
Bid requirements for public improvements.

Multiple prime bids for the general, electrical, and mechanical portions of a project are required when any individual general, electrical, or mechanical contract or any combination of individual contracts is in excess of the threshold established under section 48-01.2-02.1. If a general, mechanical, or electrical contract is estimated to be less than twenty-five percent of the threshold, the contract may be included in one of the other prime contracts. A governing body may allow submission of a single prime bid for the complete project or bids for other specialized portions of the project. A governing body may not accept the single prime bid unless that bid is lower than the combined total of the lowest responsible multiple bids for the project.

If a bid for the general, electrical, or mechanical portions of a project is not received, a governing body may:

Negotiate a contract amendment, up to an additional one hundred fifty thousand dollars, with the general, electrical, or mechanical contractor whose contract would represent the largest portion of the project cost for providing the portion of the project for which a bid was not received without rebidding all or part of the project; or

Award a contract for each portion of a project that received responsible bids pursuant to section 48-01.2-07 and readvertise for bids on the portion of the project that did not receive bids.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 403, § 14; 2011, ch. 343, § 5; 2015, ch. 318, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 382, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 318, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

48-01.2-07.
Opening of bids — Award of contract.

At the time and place specified in the notice, a governing body or its designated agent shall open publicly and read aloud each responsible bid received. The governing body shall award the contract to the lowest responsible bidder. A governing body may reject any and all bids and readvertise for bids if no bid is satisfactory or if the governing body determines any agreement has been entered by the bidders or others to prevent competition. The governing body may advertise for new bids in accordance with this chapter until a satisfactory bid is received.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 403, § 14; 2017, ch. 204, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.

Chapter Violation.

Defendant violated the competitive bidding statutes contained in this chapter, when it revised specifications to reduce construction costs and negotiated with the four low bidders without affording other bidders an opportunity to bid on the revised project. Danzl v. Bismarck, 451 N.W.2d 127, 1990 N.D. LEXIS 26 (N.D. 1990).

48-01.2-08.
Officers must not be interested in contract.

A governing body, or any member, employee, or appointee of a governing body, may not be pecuniarily interested or concerned in a contract for a public improvement entered by the governing body.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 403, § 14.

48-01.2-09.
Contract with successful bidder.

A governing body shall enter a contract with the lowest responsible bidder as determined under section 48-01.2-07. The contract must contain the following:

The written terms of the agreement and any associated document signed by the governing body and the contractor;

The required surety bond; and

Any other document deemed appropriate by the governing body and identified in the advertisement for bids.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 403, § 14.

48-01.2-10.
Bonds from contractors for public improvements.

Unless otherwise provided under this chapter, a governing body authorized to enter a contract for the construction of a public improvement in excess of two hundred thousand dollars shall take from the contractor a bond before permitting any work to be done on the contract. The bond must be for an amount equal at least to the price stated in the contract. The bond must be conditioned to be void if the contractor and all subcontractors fully perform all terms, conditions, and provisions of the contract and pay all bills or claims on account of labor performed and any supplies, and materials furnished and used in the performance of the contract, including all demands of subcontractors. The requirement that bills and claims be paid must include the requirement that interest of the amount authorized under section 13-01-14 be paid on bills and claims not paid within ninety days. The bond is security for all bills, claims, and demands until fully paid, with preference to labor and material suppliers as to payment. The bond must run to the governing body, but any person having a lawful claim against the contractor or any subcontractor may sue on the bond.

A governing body may not require any person required to provide a surety bond to obtain the surety bond from a specified insurance or surety company or insurance producer or to submit financial data to the company or producer.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 403, § 14; 2017, ch. 320, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 381, § 3, effective August 1, 2019.

48-01.2-11.
Claim for public improvement — Suit on contractor’s bond.

A person that has furnished labor or material for any public improvement for which a bond is furnished and has not been paid in full within ninety days after completion of the contribution of labor or materials may sue on the bond for the amount unpaid at the time of institution of suit. However, a person having a direct contractual relationship with a subcontractor, but no contractual relationship with the contractor furnishing the bond, does not have a claim for relief upon the bond unless that person has given written notice to the contractor, within ninety days from the date on which the person completed the contribution, stating with substantial accuracy the amount claimed and the name of the person for which the contribution was performed. The notice must be served by registered mail in an envelope addressed to the contractor at any place the contractor maintains an office, conducts business, or has a residence.

A governing body shall provide a certified copy of the bond and the contract for which the bond was given to any individual who submits an affidavit that either the individual has supplied labor or materials for the improvement and that payment has not been made or that the individual is being sued on the bond. The individual requesting the copy shall pay the actual cost of the preparation of the certified copy of the bond and the contract. The certified copy of the bond is prima facie evidence of the contents, execution, and delivery of the original.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 403, § 14.

48-01.2-12.
Claims — When barred as liens against contractor and surety.

Any claim for any labor, material, or supply furnished for an improvement, upon which a suit is not commenced within one year after completion and acceptance of the project, is barred as a lien or claim against the contractor and the contractor’s surety and any right of setoff or counterclaim may be enforced in any court in this state against the governing body, the contractor, or the contractor’s surety. This chapter does not bar the right of any person who has furnished any labor, supply, or material to any subcontractor to enforce the claim against the subcontractor.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 403, § 14.

48-01.2-13.
Payments.

At least once in each calendar month during the continuance of work upon any public improvement, the governing body shall receive and consider any partial payment estimate prepared by the architect or engineer. Upon review and approval, the governing body shall pay an estimate in an amount equal to the estimated value of the labor and material furnished plus the material adequately stored. A partial payment estimate must include retentions or retainage as follows: ten percent of each estimate until the project is fifty percent completed with no further retainage on estimates during the continuance of the contract unless unsatisfactory progress or performance is documented. The governing body may, upon completion of ninety-five percent of the contract, pay to the contractor up to ninety-five percent of the amount retained from previous estimates. The remaining amount retained must be paid to the contractor in the amounts and at the times approved by the architect or engineer. The governing body shall make final payment of all moneys due to the contractor following completion of all work, acceptance of the project by the governing body, and the provision of necessary releases. If an architect or engineer is not employed by the governing body for administration of the contract, the contractor, at the end of each calendar month during the continuance of work, may furnish a payment estimate to the governing body. After considering and approving an estimate, the governing body shall draw a warrant upon the proper fund and promptly transmit the warrant to the contractor. The governing body may invest or deposit any retained amount in a financial association or institution so that the contractor’s money retained is earning interest or dividends for the benefit of the contractor. Any amount invested or deposited must remain in the name of the governing body until final payment of all money due to the contractor is to be made.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 403, § 14.

48-01.2-14.
Late payment — Rate of interest.

If a governing body fails or neglects to consider any estimate properly submitted, pay any estimate approved, or make final payment upon completion and acceptance of a public improvement, for a period of more than thirty days from the date of approval of the estimate or the completion and acceptance date, the governing body shall pay interest on the estimate or final payment from the date of approval. The interest rate must be the rate per annum of two percentage points below the Bank of North Dakota prime interest rate as set thirty days from the date of the estimate or completion date until the issuance of a proper warrant for the payment. The governing body shall compute and add the interest to the face of the estimate or final payment and the interest must be charged to the fund upon which payment for the contract is to be made. No payment for, or on account of, any contract made under this chapter may be made except upon estimate of the architect, engineer, or contractor as provided in section 48-01.2-13.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 403, § 14.

48-01.2-15.
Appropriations may not be diverted.

No portion of any special appropriation for the erection of any public improvement, or for the doing of any work, may be drawn from the state treasury in advance of the work being completed or of the materials furnished. The funds may be drawn only upon proper estimates approved by the governing body of the institution for which the improvement is being constructed. No portion of any appropriation for any purpose may be drawn from the treasury before the appropriation is required for the purpose for which it is made, and no appropriation that is or may be made for any purpose with respect to the construction or improvement may be drawn or used for any other purpose until the construction or improvement for which the appropriation was made is fully completed and paid for.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 403, § 14.

48-01.2-16.
Architects, landscape architects, and engineers — Duties.

The governing body shall employ the architect, landscape architect, or engineer furnishing the plans as provided in this chapter or some other qualified person to provide construction administration and construction observation services for which the plans and specifications are prepared as provided by section 48-01.2-02. The architect, landscape architect, or engineer shall assist the governing body in determining that the contractor performs the work in accordance with the intent of the plans and specifications. As part of a site visit or construction observation, the architect, landscape architect, or engineer may not supervise, direct, or have control over the contractor’s work. The architect, landscape architect, or engineer may not exercise control over or responsibility for the means, methods, techniques, sequences, or procedures of construction selected or used by the contractor, the quality control of the work, the security or safety on the site, any safety precaution or program incident to the contractor’s work, the failure of the contractor to comply with any law or rule applicable to the contractor’s furnishing of or performance of the work, or the failure of the contractor to furnish or perform the work in accordance with the construction contract. The architect, landscape architect, or engineer is entitled to receive a reasonable compensation to be fixed by the governing body. Any duty imposed or power conferred upon the governing body by this chapter applies to a successor to the governing body.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 403, § 14.

48-01.2-17.
Coordination of work under multiple prime bids.

If a public improvement is awarded as multiple prime contracts for the general, electrical, mechanical work, and other prime contracts as contained in the bid for the project, the governing body may assign the coordination of the electrical and mechanical contracts and any other contracts to the general contractor for the project to facilitate the coordination of the work.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 403, § 14.

48-01.2-18.
Construction management — Governing body determinations.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a governing body may use the agency construction management or construction management at-risk delivery methods for construction of a public improvement if:

The agency construction manager has no common ownership or conflict of interest with the architect, landscape architect, or engineer involved in the planning and design of the public improvement or with any person engaged in the construction of the public improvement.

The construction manager at-risk has no common ownership or conflict of interest with the architect, landscape architect, or engineer involved in the planning and design of the public improvement.

Before utilizing the agency construction management or construction management at-risk delivery method, a governing body shall make the following determinations:

That it is in the best interest of the public to utilize the agency construction manager or construction manager at-risk public improvement delivery method.

That the agency construction manager or construction manager at-risk planning and design phase services will not duplicate services normally provided by an architect or engineer.

That the agency construction manager or construction manager at-risk construction services will be in addition to and not duplicate the services provided for in the architect and engineer contracts.

The governing body shall provide written documentation of the determinations provided for under subsection 2 upon written request from any individual.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 403, § 14.

48-01.2-19.
Agency construction management procurement procedures — Contract.

A governing body electing to utilize the agency construction management delivery method shall establish a construction management services selection committee composed of individuals the governing body determines to be qualified to make an informed decision as to the most competent and qualified person for the proposed public improvement.

The agency selection committee shall:

Develop a description of the proposed public improvement;

Enumerate each required agency construction management service for the proposed public improvement; and

Prepare the formal invitation request for qualifications, which must include the project title, the general scope of work, a description of each service required for the public improvement, the final selection criteria, the address to which responses to the request must be submitted, and the deadline for submission of responses.

The governing body shall publish a notice of the request for qualifications in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the public improvement is located and in a construction trade publication, electronic service, builders exchange, or other industry-recognized method in general circulation among the contractors, building manufacturers, and dealers in this state and shall be published for three consecutive weeks, with the first publication being at least twenty-one days before the date of opening of the request for qualifications. Upon written request, the governing body shall mail a copy of the invitation to any interested party.

After the submission deadline, the selection committee shall hold interviews with at least three persons that have responded to the advertisement and which are deemed most qualified on the basis of information available before the interviews. If less than three persons have responded to the advertisement, the committee may readvertise or hold interviews with any person that submitted a response. The selection committee’s determination as to which person will be interviewed must be in writing and must be based upon the committee’s review and evaluation of all materials submitted. The written report of the committee must list the name of each person that responded to the advertisement and enumerate any reason for selecting any person to be interviewed. The written report must be available to the public upon written request. The purpose of the interviews must be to provide any information required by the selection committee to fully acquaint the committee members with the relative qualifications of each person that responded to the advertisement.

The selection committee shall evaluate each person interviewed on the basis of the following criteria:

The past performance of the person with respect to prior public improvements.

The qualifications of proposed personnel.

The willingness to meet time and budget requirements of the governing body.

The business location of the person.

The recent, current, and projected workloads of the person.

Any related experience performing agency construction management services on projects of similar size and scope.

Any recent or current work by the person for the agency.

The ability of the person to provide the bond for the person’s portion of the work on the public improvement.

The possession by the person of a class A contractor’s license.

Based upon the evaluation under subsection 5, the selection committee shall rank the three persons which, in its judgment, are most qualified. If fewer than three persons responded to the advertisement, the selection committee shall rank each person that responded. The selection committee’s report ranking the interviewed persons must be in writing and must include data substantiating the committee’s determinations. The data must be available to the public upon written request.

The selection committee shall submit its written report ranking the interviewed persons to the governing body for evaluation and approval by the governing body. The governing body shall determine the final ranking of each person and provide written notification of the order of preference to each person that responded to the request for qualifications.

After providing the notice under subsection 7, the governing body shall negotiate a contract for services with the most qualified person at a compensation which is fair and reasonable to the governing body. If the governing body is unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract with that person, the governing body shall terminate negotiations with that person and commence negotiations in the same manner with the second and then the third most qualified person until a satisfactory contract has been negotiated. If no agreement is reached, three additional persons in order of the original ranking must be selected after consultation with the selection committee, and negotiations must be continued in the same manner until agreement is reached.

The governing body, at any time, may reject all proposals and readvertise or select another allowed project delivery method.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 403, § 14; 2013, ch. 356, § 2.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 356, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

48-01.2-20.
Selection process for construction management at-risk planning and design phase services.

A governing body electing to utilize a construction management at-risk delivery process for a proposed public improvement shall create a selection committee composed of:

An administrative individual from the governing body.

A registered architect.

A registered engineer.

A licensed contractor.

The governing body may compensate members of the selection committee. A member of the selection committee is not eligible to submit a proposal for the construction management at-risk contract under consideration.

Before issuing a notice of request for qualifications to enter a construction management at-risk services contract, the selection committee shall establish the content of the request for qualifications, which must include the following:

The identity of the governing body and a list of the members of the selection committee;

A description of the proposed public improvement;

The proposed budget limits of the public improvement;

The commencement and completion date of the public improvement;

The procedures to be used in submitting proposals;

The qualifications evaluation criteria and the relative weighting of items;

The subcontractor selection process to be used for construction services;

The number of persons to be included in the final list;

A statement indicating whether formal interviews will be held;

A statement indicating whether fees and prices must be included in any proposal;

A description of contract terms and conditions for the construction management at-risk services contract, including a description of the scope of services to be provided;

A description of the procedures to be used for making the contract award;

The insurance and bonding requirements and a statement requiring any person submitting a proposal to include with the proposal a certificate of insurance, indicating liability coverage; and

The identification and location of other pertinent information the governing body may possess, including surveys, soils reports, drawings or models of existing structures, environmental studies, photographs, or references to public records.

The request for qualifications submittal procedures must include the specific format that must be used by a construction manager at-risk when submitting a request for qualifications and the submission deadline location for submission of the request for qualifications.

The selection committee shall determine the appropriate evaluation criteria for each request for qualifications, including:

The person’s experience on any similar project;

The person’s existing workload and available capacity;

The person’s key personnel experience on any similar project;

The person’s safety record;

The person’s familiarity with the location of the public improvement;

The person’s fees and expenses;

The person’s compliance with state and federal law; and

Any reasonable information the selection committee deems necessary.

The selection committee shall evaluate each submission based on the qualification criteria under subsection 5 and shall include the numeric scoring of each criteria item on a weighted basis, with no item being weighted at more than twenty percent and no less than five percent. The weighting of the qualification criteria must be done in a manner to ensure no subjective bias and encourage the maximum participation of qualified construction managers at-risk.

The selection committee shall review each proposal submitted and include the three highest ranked construction managers at-risk on a list of finalists. If fewer than three proposals were submitted, the governing body may resolicit for qualifications, interview any person that applied, or consider using another allowed delivery method. The selection committee shall recommend to the governing body the construction manager at-risk receiving the highest score on the evaluation criteria.

If a construction manager at-risk selected for a public improvement declines the appointment or is unable to reach agreement with the governing body concerning fees or terms of the contract, the governing body shall terminate negotiations with the construction manager at-risk and begin negotiations with the construction manager at-risk with the next highest score and continue that process until agreement is reached or the list of finalists is exhausted.

If the list of finalists is exhausted, the governing body shall request the selection committee to revise the request for qualifications and solicit new submissions. If the selection committee is unable to provide any constructive revision to the request for qualifications, the governing body shall select another allowed public improvement delivery method.

The governing body, upon reaching an agreement with a construction manager at-risk on compensation and contract terms for construction management planning and design services, shall enter a written contract with the construction manager at-risk for the services.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 403, § 14; 2015, ch. 317, § 3, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 317, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.